trunk/apertium-en-ca/apertium-en-ca.en.metadix
    <pardef n="lovel/y__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or deleting -y and adding -ier and -iest (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ier</l>
          <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>iest</l>
          <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="handsome/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or directly adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/good__adj">
      <e c="CP: good comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l>good</l>
          <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>better</l>
          <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>best</l>
          <r>good<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/bad__adj">
      <e c="CP: bad comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l>bad</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>worse</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>worst</l>
          <r>bad<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ar__adj">
      <e c="CP: far comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urther</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>arther</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urthest</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>arthest</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="glad/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="broad/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either adding -er and -est or with more and the most (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="drab/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ber</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>best</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="flat/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fun/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may incorrectly form the comparative and superlative forms either doubling the final consonant and adding -er and -est or directly adding -er and -est respectively">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ner</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="glum/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that may form the comparative and superlative forms either with more and the most or doubling the final consonant and adding -r and -st (LR) respectively ">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>mest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="up/__adj">
      <e c="CP: adjectives that finish in -p and add -per and -pest to form the comparative and superlative forms">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>per</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pest</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mine__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="maybe__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="very__preadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="preadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="where__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="after__cnjadv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="that__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bad">      <i/>      <par n="/bad__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="good">      <i/>      <par n="/good__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="aware"><i>aware</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="broad"><i>broad</i><par n="broad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="extreme"><i>extreme</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="far"><i>f</i><par n="f/ar__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="flat"><i>flat</i><par n="flat/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fragile"><i>fragile</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fun"><i>fun</i><par n="fun/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="glad"><i>glad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="handsome"><i>handsome</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hers"><i>hers</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="his"><i>his</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="likely"><i>likel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="lively"><i>livel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mad"><i>mad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mine"><i>mine</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="ours"><i>ours</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="red"><i>red</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="ripe"><i>ripe</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="sad"><i>sad</i><par n="glad/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="spare"><i>spare</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="theirs"><i>theirs</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="timely"><i>timel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="unlikely"><i>unlikel</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="yours"><i>yours</i><par n="mine__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="elderly"><i>elderl</i><par n="lovel/y__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="how"><i>how</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="more"><i>more</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pretty"><i>pretty</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="really"><i>really</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="too"><i>too</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="very"><i>very</i><par n="very__preadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="for now"><i>for<b/>now</i><par n="maybe__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="how"><i>how</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e r="RL" lm="on the quiet"><i>on<b/>the<b/>quiet</i><par n="maybe__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="virtually"><i>virtually</i><par n="maybe__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="when"><i>when</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="where"><i>where</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="why"><i>why</i><par n="where__adv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="both"><i>both</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="but"><i>but</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="either"><i>either</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="nor"><i>nor</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="than"><i>than</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>    </e>
    <e lm="as well as"><i>as<b/>well<b/>as</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="if"><i>if</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e r="RL" lm="since" c="per ara RL perquè tagger s'equivoca molt amb 'pr'. (since the death of.. : des de la mort de (prep). Potser amb transfer es pot arreglar?"><i>since</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="even so"><i>even<b/>so</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="whether"><i>whether</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/>    </e>
    <e lm="that"><i>that</i><par n="that__cnjsub"/>    </e>
    <e lm="either"><i>either</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/>     </e>
    <e lm="fairly"><i>fairly</i><par n="very__preadv"/>     </e>
    <e lm="ochre"><i>ochre</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/>     </e>
    <e lm="passionately"><i>passionately</i><par n="maybe__adv"/>     </e>
    <e lm="mute" a="greenbreen"><i>mute</i><par n="handsome/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="whenever" a="greenbreen"><i>whenever</i><par n="that__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="all autumn"><i>all<b/>autumn</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="eastwards"><i>eastwards</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="on cue"><i>on<b/>cue</i><par n="maybe__adv"/></e>
<e lm="the same as"><i>the<b/>same<b/>as</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="and neither" r="RL"><i>and<b/>neither</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="for example"><i>for<b/>example</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
